Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RED ROCK RURAL WATER SYSTEM.new text end new text begin $3,900,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for a grant to the Red Rock Rural Water System to acquire land containing a groundwater aquifer so that the system can continue to provide safe, high-quality water services to its community. new text end